Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.450

Uniformity.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

[ 2009 c 81 s 21.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.